Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1502.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.118, is amended to read: 120B.118 TITLE; THE READ ACT. new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Title. new text end Sections 120B.118 to 120B.124 may be cited as the "Reading to Ensure Academic Development Act" or the "Read Act." new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Policy. new text end new text begin It is the intent of the legislature that public schools promote foundational literacy and grade-level reading proficiency through the use of curricula, textbooks, instructional materials, instructional practices, interventions, and teacher development and training based solely on the science of reading. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.119, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Evidence-based. "Evidence-based" new text begin or "science of reading" new text end means the instruction or item described is based on reliable, trustworthy, and valid deleted text begin evidence and has demonstrated a record of success in increasing students' reading competency in the areas of phonological and phonemic awareness, phonics, vocabulary development, reading fluency, and reading comprehensiondeleted text end new text begin science-based researchnew text end . Evidence-based literacy instruction is explicit, systematic, and includes phonological and phonemic awareness, phonics and decoding, spelling, fluency, vocabulary, oral language, and comprehension that can be differentiated to meet the needs of individual students. Evidence-based instruction does not include the three-cueing system, as defined in subdivision 16. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.119, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 14a. new text end new text begin Science-based reading research. new text end new text begin "Science-based reading research" means research that: new text end new text begin (1) applies rigorous, systematic, and objective observational or experimental procedures to obtain knowledge relevant to reading development, reading instruction, and reading and writing difficulties; and new text end new text begin (2) explains how proficient reading and writing develop, why some children have difficulties developing key literacy skills, and how schools can best assess and instruct early literacy, including the use of evidence-based literacy instruction practices to promote reading and writing achievement. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.123, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Department of Education. (a) By July 1, 2023, the department must make available to districts a list of approved evidence-based screeners in accordance with section 120B.12. A district must use an approved screener to assess students' mastery of foundational reading skills in accordance with section 120B.12. (b) The Department of Education must partner with CAREI as required under section 120B.124 to approve professional development programs, subject to final determination by the department. After the implementation partnership under section 120B.124 ends, the department must continue to regularly provide districts with information about professional development opportunities available throughout the state on reading instruction that is evidence-based. (c) The department and CAREI must identify training required for a literacy lead and literacy specialist employed by a district or Minnesota service cooperatives. (d) The department must employ one or more literacy specialists to provide support to districts implementing the Read Act and coordinate duties assigned to the department under the Read Act. The literacy specialist must work on state efforts to improve literacy tracking and implementation. (e) The department must develop a template for a local literacy plan in accordance with section 120B.12, subdivision 4a. (f) The department must partner with CAREI as required under section 120B.124 to approve literacy intervention modelsnew text begin by June 30, 2025new text end , subject to final determination by the department. The department must make a list of the deleted text begin 15deleted text end approved evidence-based intervention models available to districts as they are approved by CAREIdeleted text begin , starting November 1, 2025. Upon approval of the evidence-based intervention models, the department must ensure the models are reviewed by a contracted third party for culturally responsive guidance and materials, and make those findings available to districts once the review process is complete. The department must notify districts of the two-step review process for all materials approved under the Read Act for effectiveness as evidence-based structured literacy, and for cultural responsivenessdeleted text end .new text begin The department may identify additional literacy intervention models after the partnership with CAREI has ended.new text end (g) The department and CAREI must provide ongoing coaching, mentoring, and support to certified trained facilitators. new text begin (h) CAREI must complete all requirements under paragraphs (a) to (g) by June 30, 2025. Starting July 1, 2025, the department must complete any ongoing activities required under this subdivision without assistance from CAREI. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.124, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Resources. deleted text begin (a)deleted text end The Department of Education must partner with CAREI for two years beginning July 1, 2023, until deleted text begin Augustdeleted text end new text begin Junenew text end 30, 2025, to support implementation of the Read Act. The department and CAREI must jointly: (1) identify at least five literacy curricula and supporting materials that are evidence-based or focused on structured literacy by January 1, 2024, and post a list of the curricula on the department website. The list must include curricula that use culturally and linguistically responsive materials that reflect diverse populations and curricula that reflect the experiences of students from diverse backgrounds, including multilingual learners, biliterate students, and students who are Black, Indigenous, and People of Color. A district that purchases an approved curriculum before the cultural responsiveness review is completed is encouraged to work with the curriculum's publisher to obtain updated materials that are culturally and linguistically responsive and reflect diverse populations. A district is not required to use an approved curriculum; (2) identify at least three professional development programs that focus on the five pillars of literacy and the components of structured literacy by August 15, 2023, subject to final approval by the department. The department must post a list of the programs on the department website. The programs may include a program offered by CAREI. The requirements of section 16C.08 do not apply to the selection of a provider under this section; (3) identify evidence-based literacy intervention materials for students in kindergarten through grade 12; (4) develop an evidence-based literacy lead training and coaching program that trains and supports literacy specialists throughout Minnesota to support schools' efforts in screening, measuring growth, monitoring progress, and implementing interventions in accordance with subdivision 1. Literacy lead training must include instruction on how to train paraprofessionals and volunteers that provide Tier 2 interventions on evidence-based literacy intervention; (5) identify measures of foundational literacy skills and mastery that a district must report on a local literacy plan; (6) provide guidance to districts about best practices in literacy instruction, and practices that are not evidence-based; (7) develop MTSS model plans that districts may adopt to support efforts to screen, identify, intervene, and monitor the progress of students not reading at grade level; (8) ensure that teacher professional development options and MTSS framework trainings are geographically equitable by supporting trainings through the regional service cooperatives; (9) develop a coaching and mentorship program for certified trained facilitators based on the previously approved trainings; and (10) identify at least 15 evidence-based literacy intervention models by deleted text begin November 1deleted text end new text begin June 30new text end , 2025, and post a list of the interventions on the department website. A district is not required to use an approved intervention model. deleted text begin (b) The department must contract with a third party to develop culturally and linguistically responsive supplemental materials and guidance for the approved literacy curricula to meet the culturally and linguistically responsive standards under paragraph (a), clause (1). deleted text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.124, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Ongoing review of literacy materials. The department may partner with one or more institutions of higher education to conduct independent and objective reviews of curriculum and intervention materials. The department must determine whether it will partner with an institution of higher education to conduct ongoing reviews of literacy materials by June 1, 2026. A publisher may submit curriculum or intervention materials for review. The publisher is responsible for paying the cost of the review directly to the institution of higher education. The review must use the rubric used to approve curriculum under subdivision 1. The department and institution of higher education may approve the curriculum or intervention materials if they determine that the curriculum or intervention materials are evidence-baseddeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin andnew text end focused on structured literacydeleted text begin , culturally and linguistically responsive, and reflect diverse populationsdeleted text end . The department must add the approved curriculum or intervention materials to the list of curricula and materials approved under the Read Act. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.124, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Comprehensive review of literacy materials. Starting in 2033, the department and an institution of higher education may partner to conduct a comprehensive review of curriculum and intervention materials to identify literacy curriculum deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin ,new text end supporting materials, and intervention materials that are evidence-baseddeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin andnew text end focused on structured literacydeleted text begin , culturally and linguistically responsive, and reflect diverse populationsdeleted text end . The department must revise the list of approved curriculum and supporting materials, and intervention materials based on the findings of the review. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.124, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Partnership expiration. new text end new text begin The partnership between the department and CAREI expires June 30, 2025. Starting July 1, 2025, the department must complete any duties provided under this section without participation by CAREI. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 122A.091, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Teacher and administrator preparation and performance data; report. (a) The Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board and the Board of School Administrators, in cooperation with board-approved teacher or administrator preparation programs, annually must collect and report summary data on teacher and administrator preparation and performance outcomes, consistent with this subdivision. The Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board and the Board of School Administrators annually by July 1 must update and post the reported summary preparation and performance data on teachers and administrators from the preceding school years on their respective websites. (b) Publicly reported summary data on teacher preparation providers must include: (1) summary data on teacher educator qualifications and their years of experience either as birth through grade 12 classroom teachers or school administrators; (2) the current number and percentage of enrolled candidates who entered the program through a transfer pathway disaggregated by race, except when disaggregation would not yield statistically reliable results or would reveal personally identifiable information about an individual; (3) the current number and percentage of program completers by program who received a Tier 3 or Tier 4 license disaggregated by race, except when disaggregation would not yield statistically reliable results or would reveal personally identifiable information about an individual; (4) the current number and percentage of program completers who entered the program through a transfer pathway and received a Tier 3 or Tier 4 license disaggregated by race, except when disaggregation would not yield statistically reliable results or would reveal personally identifiable information about an individual; (5) the current number and percentage of program completers who were hired to teach full time in their licensure field in a Minnesota district or school in the preceding year disaggregated by race, except when disaggregation would not yield statistically reliable results or would reveal personally identifiable information about an individual; (6) the current number and percentage of program completers who entered the program through a transfer pathway and who were hired to teach full time in their licensure field in a Minnesota district or school in the preceding year disaggregated by race, except when disaggregation would not yield statistically reliable results or would reveal personally identifiable information about an individual; (7) board-adopted survey results measuring initial licensure program quality and structure in the preceding school year disaggregated by race, except when disaggregation would not yield statistically reliable results or would reveal personally identifiable information about an individual; (8) board-adopted survey results from school principals or supervisors on initial licensure program quality and structure; and (9) the number and percentage of program completers who met or exceeded the state threshold score on deleted text begin thedeleted text end new text begin anew text end board-adopted teacher new text begin examination or new text end performance assessmentnew text begin required under section 122A.185new text end . Program reporting must be consistent with subdivision 2. (c) Publicly reported summary data on administrator preparation programs approved by the Board of School Administrators must include: (1) summary data on faculty qualifications, including at least the content areas of faculty undergraduate and graduate degrees and the years of experience either as kindergarten through grade 12 classroom teachers or school administrators; (2) the average time program graduates in the preceding year needed to complete the program; (3) the current number and percentage of students who graduated, received a standard Minnesota administrator license, and were employed as an administrator in a Minnesota school district or school in the preceding year disaggregated by race, except when disaggregation would not yield statistically reliable results or would reveal personally identifiable information about an individual; (4) the number of credits by graduate program that students in the preceding school year needed to complete to graduate; (5) survey results measuring student, graduate, and employer satisfaction with the program in the preceding school year disaggregated by race, except when disaggregation would not yield statistically reliable results or would reveal personally identifiable information about an individual; and (6) information under subdivision 3, paragraphs (c) and (d). Program reporting must be consistent with section 122A.14, subdivision 10. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 122A.185, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Tests. (a) The board must adopt rules requiring applicants for Tier 3 and Tier 4 licenses to pass an examination or performance assessment of general pedagogical knowledge and examinations or assessments of licensure field specific content. An applicant is exempt from the examination requirements if the applicant: (1) completed a board-approved teacher preparation program; (2) completed licensure via portfolio pursuant to section 122A.18, subdivision 10, and the portfolio has been recommended; (3) obtained national board certification from the National Board for Professional Teaching Standards; or (4) completed a state-approved teacher preparation program in another state and passed licensure examinations in that state, if applicable. The content examination requirement does not apply if no relevant content exam exists. new text begin (b) The board must adopt rules requiring applicants for Tier 3 and Tier 4 licenses in elementary education to pass an examination or performance assessment of knowledge, skill, and ability to teach the science of reading, as defined in section 120B.119. new text end deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end All testing centers in the state must provide monthly opportunities for untimed content and pedagogy examinations. These opportunities must be advertised on the test registration website. The board must require the exam vendor to provide other equitable opportunities to pass exams, including: (1) waiving testing fees for test takers who qualify for federal grants; (2) providing free, multiple, full-length practice tests for each exam and free, comprehensive study guides on the test registration website; (3) making content and pedagogy exams available in languages other than English for teachers seeking licensure to teach in language immersion programs; and (4) providing free, detailed exam results analysis by test objective to assist applicants who do not pass an exam in identifying areas for improvement. Any applicant who has not passed a required exam after two attempts must be allowed to retake the exam, including new versions of the exam, without being charged an additional fee. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 11. Laws 2023, chapter 55, article 3, section 11, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. CAREI. (a) To contract with the Center for Applied Research and Educational Improvement at the University of Minnesota for the Read Act implementation partnership under section 120B.124: $ 4,200,000 ..... 2024 $ 0 ..... 2025 (b) This appropriation is available until June 30, deleted text begin 2026deleted text end new text begin 2025new text end . (c) The base for fiscal year 2026 and later is $0. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 12. Laws 2024, chapter 115, article 3, section 8, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Culturally responsive materials. (a) For the Department of Education to issue a request for proposals for a contract to develop supplemental culturally responsive materials for the approved evidence-based structured literacy curricula under Minnesota Statutes, section 120B.124, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (1): $ 1,000,000 ..... 2025 (b) The contractor must review all approved instructional and intervention materials to ensure they are culturally responsive within 90 days of receiving the materials from the Department of Education. The contractor must work with publishers to ensure materials are culturally responsive and provide districts with supplementary materials and guidance as needed. (c) This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, deleted text begin 2027deleted text end new text begin 2025new text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 13. Laws 2024, chapter 115, article 3, section 8, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. CAREI paraprofessional and volunteer training. (a) For CAREI to develop training for paraprofessionals and volunteers that regularly provide Tier 2 literacy interventions to students in accordance with Minnesota Statutes, section 120B.124, subdivision 4: $ 375,000 ..... 2025 (b) This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, deleted text begin 2027deleted text end new text begin 2025new text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end